DI-480

DIAGNOSTICS - SUPPLEMENTALRESTRAINT SYSTEM

DI1B6-09

DTC

B0 105/53

Short in P Squib Circuit

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

The P squib circuit consists of the airbag sensor assembly and front passenger airbag assembly.

It causes the SRS to deploy when the SRS deployment conditions are satisfied.
For details of the function of each component, see OPERATION on page RS-2.
DTC B0105/53 is recorded when a short is detected in the P squib circuit.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

e Shortcircuitin P squib wire harness « Front passenger airbag assembly (P squib)
B0105/53 ¢ P squib malfunction « Airbag sensorassembly

« Airbag sensor assembly malfunction *Wire harness
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DI-481
DIAGNOSTICS - SUPPLEMENTAL RESTRAINT SYSTEM

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Prepare for inspection. (See step 1 on page DI-549)

-

2 [ Check P squib circuit.

PREPARATION:
Release airbag activation prevention mechanism of the con-
:l Airbag nector (on the airbag sensor assembly side) between the front
CD :| Sensor passenger airbag assembly and the airbag sensor assembly.
:l Assembly CHECK:

P Squib

For the connector (on the front passenger airbag assembly
% side) between the front passenger airbag assembly and the air-
bag sensor assembly, measure the resistance between P+ and
P-.
OK:
Resistance: 1 MQ2 or Higher

R14286
H02142 H02251

tween front passenger airbag assembly and air-

NG Repair or replace harness or connector be-
bag sensor assembly.
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3 | Check airbag sensor assembly.

P Squib

:l Airbag

dlb

Sensor

H01023
Ho2144
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Assembly
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DTC B0105/53

H02252
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PREPARATION:

(@ Connect the connector to the airbag sensor assembly.

(b) Using a service wire, connect P+ and P- of the connector
(on the front passenger airbag assembly side) between
the airbag sensor assembly and the front passenger air-
bag assembly.

() Connect negative (-) terminal cable to the battery, and
wait at least for 2 seconds.

CHECK:
(@  Turnignition switch to ACC or ON and wait at least for 20
seconds.

(b) Clear DTC stored in memory.
(See page DI-447)
(¢)  Turnignition switch to LOCK, and wait at least for 20 se-
conds.
(d)  Turnignition switch to ACC or ON, and wait at least for 20
seconds.
(e) Check DTC.
(See page DI-447)
OK:
DTCBO0 105/53is notoutput.
HINT:
Codes other than code B0105/53 may be output at this time, but
they are not relevant to this check.

NG> Replace airbag sensor assembly.
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4 [ Check P squib.

P Squib :l
Airbag
C[l: Sensor
gl Assembly
ACC ON

D

or

Check Connector

HO1024
ABO118 ABO119

R13006 H01077

DTC B0105/53

H01202

PREPARATION:

(@)
(b)

(©
(d)

Turn ignition switch to LOCK.

Disconnect negative (-) terminal cable from the battery,
and wait at least for 90 seconds.

Connect the front passenger airbag assembly connector.
Connect negative (-) terminal cable to the battery, and
wait at least for 2 seconds.

CHECK:

(@)

OK:

HINT:

Turn ignition switch to LOOK, and wait at least for 20 se-
conds.

Turn ignition switch to ACC or ON, and wait at least for 20
seconds.

Clear DTC stored in memory.

(See page DI-447)

Turn ignition switch to LOCK, and wait at least for 20 se-
conds.

Turn ignition switch to ACC or ON, and wait at least for 20
seconds.

Check DTC.

(See page DI-447)

DTCBO 105/53is notoutput.

Codes other than code B0105/53 may be output at this time, but
they are not relevant to this check.

NG > Replace front passenger airbag assembly.

From the results of the above inspection, the malfunctioning part can now be considered normal.
To make sure of this, use the simulation method to check.
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